Connecticut, session 2026, SB00470.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 3-61b of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Any property held pursuant to a funeral service contract that is in
effect on or after July 1, 2025, for the purposes of this part, shall be
considered payable or distributable on the earliest of: (1) When the
holder has received affirmative notification of the death of a beneficiary
associated with a funeral [services] service contract for which the holder
is maintaining an escrow account; (2) the date the beneficiary would
have attained the age of one hundred ten years; or (3) seventy-five years
after the funeral service contract was executed.
Sec. 2. Section 10a-151i of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
For any qualified contract described in subdivision (1) of subsection
(b) of section 10a-151f, and any revenue contract or nonmonetary

Senate Bill No. 470
contract that is not a qualified contract, as such terms are defined in
section 10a-151f, that is entered into or amended on or after [July 1, 2026]
the effective date of this section, by the chief executive officer of the
Board of Regents for Higher Education or the chief executive officer of
an institution within the jurisdiction of the Board of Regents for Higher
Education or by the chief executive officer of The University of
Connecticut, the chief executive officer shall require such contract to
either (1) comply with the provisions of subsection (d) of section 4a-60,
and set forth the full text of subdivisions (1) to (5), inclusive, of
subsection (b) of section 4a-60, or (2) set forth the following affirmation:
"Each party agrees, as required by section 4a-60 of the Connecticut
General Statutes, not to discriminate against any person on the basis of
race, color, religious creed, age, marital status, national origin, ancestry,
sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, status as a
veteran, status as a victim of domestic violence, intellectual disability,
mental disability or physical disability, including, but not limited to,
blindness, unless it is shown by such party that such disability prevents
performance of the work involved. Each party agrees to comply with all
applicable federal and state of Connecticut nondiscrimination and
affirmative action laws, including, but not limited to, section 4a-60 of the
Connecticut General Statutes.".
Sec. 3. Section 45a-594 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) Compensation payable to the conservator or guardian of any
person who is supported wholly or in part by the state in any humane
institution, or who is receiving benefits under any of the state's
programs of public assistance, shall be based upon services rendered
and shall not exceed five per cent of the gross income to the estate
during the period covered by any account. The conservator or guardian
shall be entitled to compensation of not less than fifty dollars for any
Public Act No. 26-118 2 of 4

Senate Bill No. 470
accounting period continuing for at least a year. If extraordinary
services are rendered by any conservator or guardian, the [court of
probate] Probate Court, upon petition and hearing, may authorize
reasonable additional compensation. No commission or compensation
shall be allowed on any moneys or other assets received from a prior
guardian or conservator nor upon any amount received from
liquidation of loans or other investments.
(b) Compensation payable to the conservator or guardian of any
veteran or other beneficiary of the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs for administering moneys paid by the United States through the
department, or revenue or profit from any property wholly or partially
acquired therewith, shall be based upon services rendered and shall not
exceed five per cent of the amount of moneys received during the period
covered by the account. If extraordinary services are rendered by any
conservator or guardian, the [Court of Probate] Probate Court, upon
petition and hearing, may authorize reasonable additional
compensation. A copy of the petition and notice of hearing shall be
given to the proper office of the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs in the manner provided for hearing on other petitions or
pleadings filed by such conservators or guardians. No commission or
compensation shall be allowed on the moneys or other assets received
from a prior guardian nor upon the amount received from liquidation
of loans or other investments.
Sec. 4. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 45a-649 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) (A) The court shall direct that personal service of the citation be
made, by a state marshal, constable or an indifferent person, upon the
respondent and the respondent's spouse, if any, if the spouse is not the
applicant. (B) Except for the respondent, if the address of any other
person entitled to personal service is unknown, or if personal service or
Public Act No. 26-118 3 of 4

Senate Bill No. 470
service at the person's usual place of abode cannot be reasonably
effected within the state, or if the person is out of the state, the judge or
the clerk of the court shall order notice be given by registered or certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by publication not less than ten days
before the date of the hearing. Any such publication shall be in a
newspaper of general circulation in the place of the last known address
of the person to be notified, whether within or without this state, or if
no such address is known, in the place where the petition has been filed.
(C) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision, in cases where the application is for involuntary
representation pursuant to section 17b-456 or in cases where notice is
provided pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this subdivision, the court
shall further order notice by certified mail to the children of the
respondent, and if none, the parents of the respondent, and if none, the
brothers and sisters of the respondent or their representatives, and if
none, the next of kin of such respondent.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-118 4 of 4